South Dakota, session 2026, HB1066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 44-9-13 be AMENDED:
44-9-13. Any contractor, subcontractor, or supplier on any improvement of real
estate within the purview of this chapter who, having received or been entrusted with the
property of another for the purpose of improvement of real estate, and with the intent to
defraud, appropriates that property for any purpose other than the payment for labor,
skill, or materials for improvement of the real estate for which it was received, is guilty of
theft. Any person guilty of theft pursuant to this section is subject to the penalties under
§ 22-30A-17.

26.188.11 2 1066
An Act to revise a provision related to theft by a contractor, subcontractor, or supplier.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1066
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1066 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1066 ENROLLED